Hawaii statutes.
[§194-4 Relation of chapter to other laws.]
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, and in addition to any other
authority provided by law that is not inconsistent with the purposes of this [chapter], a department is authorized to
examine, control, and eradicate all instances of invasive species identified by
the council for control or eradication and found on any public or private
premises or in any aircraft or vessel landed or docked in waters of the State. [L
2003, c 85, §5; am L 2004, c 10, §16; am L 2006, c 109, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next